North Dakota, session 69, HB1426.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 24-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
CPL Raymond Porter Korea bridge - State highway - Continuing appropriation.
The department shall designate the bridge on state highway 6 between the junction of county road
one thirty - seven and the junction of fifty - third street as the CPL Raymond Porter Korea bridge and shal l
place signs along the avenue designating that name. The department may accept any appropriate signs
or funds donated to the department for the placement of signs. Any donated funds are appropriated to
the department on a continuing basis for the purpose of providing signs designating the bridge on state
highway 6 as the CPL Raymond Porter Korea bridge .
SECTION 2. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

H. B. NO. 1426 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1426 and that
two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State